Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5018.
people of the state of michigan enact: CHAPTER XIIA Sec. 2. The court has the following authority and jurisdiction: (a) Exclusive original jurisdiction superior to and regardless of the jurisdiction of another court in proceedings concerning a juvenile who is under 18 years of age and who is found within the county if 1 or more of the following apply: (1) Except as otherwise provided in this sub-subdivision, the juvenile has violated any municipal ordinance or law of the this state or of the United States. If the court enters into an agreement under section 2e of this chapter, the court has jurisdiction over a juvenile who committed a civil infraction as provided in that section. The court has jurisdiction over a juvenile 14 years of age or older who is charged with a specified juvenile violation only if the prosecuting attorney files a petition in the court instead of authorizing a complaint and warrant. As used in this sub-subdivision, "specified juvenile violation" means 1 or more of the following: (A) A violation of section 72, 83, 86, 89, 91, 316, 317, 349, 520b, 529, 529a, or 531 of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.72, 750.83, 750.86, 750.89, 750.91, 750.316, 750.317, 750.349, 750.520b, 750.529, 750.529a, and 750.531. (B) A violation of section 84 or 110a(2) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.84 and 750.110a, if the juvenile is armed with a dangerous weapon. As used in this paragraph, "dangerous weapon" means 1 or more of the following: (i) A loaded or unloaded firearm, whether operable or inoperable. (ii) A knife, stabbing instrument, brass knuckles, blackjack, club, or other object specifically designed or customarily carried or possessed for use as a weapon. (iii) An object that is likely to cause death or bodily injury when used as a weapon and that is used as a weapon or carried or possessed for use as a weapon. (iv) An object or device that is used or fashioned in a manner to lead a person to believe the object or device is an object or device described in subparagraphs (i) to (iii). (C) A violation of section 186a of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.186a, regarding escape or attempted escape from a juvenile facility, but only if the juvenile facility from which the individual escaped or attempted to escape was 1 of the following: (i) A high-security or medium-security facility operated by the department or a county juvenile agency. (ii) A high-security facility operated by a private agency under contract with the department or a county juvenile agency. (D) A violation of section 7401(2)(a)(i) or 7403(2)(a)(i) of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7401 and 333.7403. (E) An attempt to commit a violation described in paragraphs (A) to (D). (F) Conspiracy to commit a violation described in paragraphs (A) to (D). (G) Solicitation to commit a violation described in paragraphs (A) to (D). (H) A lesser included offense of a violation described in paragraphs (A) to (G) if the individual is charged with a violation described in paragraphs (A) to (G). (I) Another violation arising out of the same transaction as a violation described in paragraphs (A) to (G) if the individual is charged with a violation described in paragraphs (A) to (G). (2) The juvenile has deserted his or her the juvenile's home without sufficient cause, and the court finds on the record that the juvenile has been placed or refused alternative placement or the juvenile and the juvenile's parent, guardian, or custodian have exhausted or refused family counseling. (3) The juvenile is repeatedly disobedient to the reasonable and lawful commands of his or her the juvenile's parents, guardian, or custodian, and the court finds on the record by clear and convincing evidence that court-accessed services are necessary. (4) The juvenile willfully and repeatedly absents himself or herself from school or other learning program intended to meet the juvenile's educational needs, or repeatedly violates rules and regulations of the school or other learning program, and the court finds on the record that the juvenile, the juvenile's parent, guardian, or custodian, and school officials or learning program personnel have met on the juvenile's educational problems and educational counseling and alternative agency help have been sought. As used in this sub-subdivision only, "learning program" means an organized educational program that is appropriate, given the age, intelligence, ability, and psychological limitations of a juvenile, in the subject areas of reading, spelling, mathematics, science, history, civics, writing, and English grammar. (b) Jurisdiction in proceedings concerning a juvenile under 18 years of age found within the county: (1) Whose parent or other person legally responsible for the care and maintenance of the juvenile, when able to do so, neglects or refuses to provide proper or necessary support, education, medical, surgical, or other care necessary for his or her the juvenile's health or morals, who is subject to a substantial risk of harm to his or her the juvenile's mental well-being, who is abandoned by his or her the juvenile's parents, guardian, or other custodian, or who is without proper custody or guardianship. As used in this sub-subdivision: (A) "Education" means learning based on an organized educational program that is appropriate, given the age, intelligence, ability, and psychological limitations of a juvenile, in the subject areas of reading, spelling, mathematics, science, history, civics, writing, and English grammar. (B) "Neglect" means that term as defined in section 2 of the child abuse and neglect prevention act, 1982 PA 250, MCL 722.602. (C) "Without proper custody or guardianship" does not mean a parent has placed the juvenile with another person who is legally responsible for the care and maintenance of the juvenile and who is able to and does provide the juvenile with proper care and maintenance. (2) Whose home or environment, by reason of neglect, cruelty, drunkenness, criminality, or depravity on the part of a parent, guardian, nonparent adult, or other custodian, is an unfit place for the juvenile to live in. As used in this sub-subdivision, "neglect" means that term as defined in section 2 of the child abuse and neglect prevention act, 1982 PA 250, MCL 722.602. (3) If the juvenile is dependent and is in danger of substantial physical or psychological harm. The juvenile may be found to be dependent when any of the following occurs:occur: (A) The juvenile is homeless or not domiciled with a parent or other legally responsible person. (B) The juvenile has repeatedly run away from home and is beyond the control of a parent or other legally responsible person. (C) The juvenile is alleged to have committed a commercial sexual activity as that term is defined in section 462a of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.462a, or a delinquent act that is the result of force, fraud, coercion, or manipulation exercised by a parent or other adult. (D) The juvenile's custodial parent or legally responsible person has died or has become permanently incapacitated and no appropriate parent or legally responsible person is willing and able to provide care for the juvenile. (4) Whose parent has substantially failed, without good cause, to comply with a limited guardianship placement plan described in section 5205 of the estates and protected individuals code, 1998 PA 386, MCL 700.5205, regarding the juvenile. (5) Whose parent has substantially failed, without good cause, to comply with a court-structured plan described in section 5207 or 5209 of the estates and protected individuals code, 1998 PA 386, MCL 700.5207 and 700.5209, regarding the juvenile. (6) If the juvenile has a guardian under the estates and protected individuals code, 1998 PA 386, MCL 700.1101 to 700.8206, and the juvenile's parent meets both of the following criteria: (A) The parent, having the ability to support or assist in supporting the juvenile, has failed or neglected, without good cause, to provide regular and substantial support for the juvenile for 2 years or more before the filing of the petition or, if a support order has been entered, has failed to substantially comply with the order for 2 years or more before the filing of the petition. As used in this sub-subdivision, "neglect" means that term as defined in section 2 of the child abuse and neglect prevention act, 1982 PA 250, MCL 722.602. (B) The parent, having the ability to visit, contact, or communicate with the juvenile, has regularly and substantially failed or neglected, without good cause, to do so for 2 years or more before the filing of the petition. As used in this sub-subdivision, "neglect" means that term as defined in section 2 of the child abuse and neglect prevention act, 1982 PA 250, MCL 722.602. If a petition is filed in the court alleging that a juvenile is within the provisions of this subdivision and the custody of that juvenile is subject to the prior or continuing order of another court of record of this state, the manner of notice to the other court of record and the authority of the court to proceed is governed by rule of the supreme court. (c) Jurisdiction over juveniles under 18 years of age, jurisdiction of whom has been waived to the family division of circuit court by a circuit court under a provision in a temporary order for custody of juveniles based upon a complaint for divorce or upon a motion related to a complaint for divorce by the prosecuting attorney, in a divorce judgment dissolving a marriage between the juvenile's parents, or by an amended judgment relative to the juvenile's custody in a divorce. (d) If the court finds on the record that voluntary services have been exhausted or refused, concurrent jurisdiction in proceedings concerning a juvenile between the ages of 17 and 18 years of age found within the county who is 1 or more of the following: (1) Repeatedly addicted to the use of drugs or the intemperate use of alcoholic liquors. (2) Repeatedly associating with criminal, dissolute, or disorderly persons. (3) Found of his or her the juvenile's own free will and knowledge in a house of prostitution, in which commercial sexual activity is committed, a house of assignation, or ill-fame.a house of ill fame. (4) Repeatedly associating with thieves, prostitutes, persons who provide or offer to provide commercial sexual activity, pimps, or procurers. (5) Willfully disobedient to the reasonable and lawful commands of his or her the juvenile's parents, guardian, or other custodian and in danger of becoming morally depraved. If a juvenile is brought before the court in a county other than that in which the juvenile resides, before a hearing and with the consent of the judge of the court in the county of residence, the court may enter an order transferring jurisdiction of the matter to the court of the county of residence. Consent to transfer jurisdiction is not required if the county of residence is a county juvenile agency and satisfactory proof of residence is furnished to the court of the county of residence. The order does not constitute a legal settlement in this state that is required for the purpose of section 55 of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.55. The order and a certified copy of the proceedings in the transferring court must be delivered to the court of the county of residence. A case designated as a case in which the juvenile must be tried in the same manner as an adult under section 2d of this chapter may be transferred for venue or for juvenile disposition, but must not be transferred on grounds of residency. If the case is not transferred, the court having jurisdiction of the offense shall try the case. (e) Authority to establish or assist in developing a program or programs within the county to prevent delinquency and provide services to act upon reports submitted to the court related to the behavior of a juvenile who does not require formal court jurisdiction but otherwise falls within subdivision (a). These services must be used only if the juvenile and his or her the juvenile's parents, guardian, or custodian voluntarily accepts them. (f) If the court operates a detention home for juveniles within the court's jurisdiction under subdivision (a)(1), authority to place a juvenile within that home pending trial if the juvenile is within the circuit court's jurisdiction under section 606 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.606, and if the circuit court orders the family division of circuit court in the same county to place the juvenile in that home. The family division of circuit court shall comply with that order. (g) Authority to place a juvenile in a county jail under section 27a of chapter IV of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 764.27a, if the court designates the case under section 2d of this chapter as a case in which the juvenile is to be tried in the same manner as an adult and the court determines there is probable cause to believe that the offense was committed and probable cause to believe the juvenile committed that offense. (h) Jurisdiction over a proceeding under section 2950 or 2950a of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.2950 and 600.2950a, in which a minor less than 18 years of age is the respondent, or a proceeding to enforce a valid foreign protection order issued against a respondent who is a minor less than 18 years of age. A personal protection order must not be issued against a respondent who is a minor less than 10 years of age. Venue for an initial action under section 2950 or 2950a of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.2950 and 600.2950a, is proper in the county of residence of either the petitioner or respondent. If the respondent does not live in this state, venue for the initial action is proper in the petitioner's county of residence. (i) In a proceeding under this chapter concerning a juvenile's care and supervision, the court may issue orders affecting a party as necessary. This subdivision does not apply after May 1, 2018. As used in this subdivision, "party" means 1 of the following: (i) In a delinquency proceeding, the petitioner and juvenile. (ii) In a child protective proceeding, the petitioner, department, child, respondent, parent, guardian, or legal custodian, and any licensed child caring institution or child placing agency under contract with the department to provide for a juvenile's care and supervision. Sec. 13a. (1) As used in this section and sections 2, 6b, 13b, 17c, 17d, 18f, 19, 19a, 19b, and 19c of this chapter: (a) "Agency" means a public or private organization, institution, or facility that is performing the functions under part D of title IV of the social security act, 42 USC 651 to 669b, or that is responsible under court order or contractual arrangement for a juvenile's care and supervision. (b) "Agency case file" means the current file from the agency providing direct services to the child, that may include the child protective services file if the child has not been removed from the home or the department or contract agency foster care file as provided under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128. (c) "Attorney" means, if appointed to represent a child in a proceeding under section 2(b) or (c) of this chapter, an attorney serving as the child's legal advocate in a traditional attorney-client relationship with the child, as governed by the Michigan Rules of Professional Conduct. An attorney defined under this subdivision owes the same duties of undivided loyalty, confidentiality, and zealous representation of the child's expressed wishes as the attorney would to an adult client. For the purpose of a notice required under these sections, attorney includes a child's lawyer-guardian ad litem. (d) "Case service plan" means the plan developed by an agency and prepared under section 18f of this chapter that includes services to be provided by and responsibilities and obligations of the agency and activities, responsibilities, and obligations of the parent. The case service plan may be referred to using different names than case service plan, including, but not limited to, a parent/agency agreement or a parent/agency treatment plan and service agreement. (e) "Foster care" means care provided to a juvenile in a foster family home, foster family group home, or child caring institution licensed or approved under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128, or care provided to a juvenile in a relative's home under a court order. (f) "Guardian ad litem" means an individual whom the court appoints to assist the court in determining the child's best interests. A guardian ad litem does not need to be an attorney. (g) "Lawyer-guardian ad litem" means an attorney appointed under section 17c of this chapter. A lawyer-guardian ad litem represents the child, and has the powers and duties, as set forth in section 17d of this chapter. The provisions of section 17d of this chapter also apply to a lawyer-guardian ad litem appointed under each of the following: (i) Section 5213 or 5219 of the estates and protected individuals code, 1998 PA 386, MCL 700.5213 and 700.5219. (ii) Section 4 of the child custody act of 1970, 1970 PA 91, MCL 722.24. (iii) Section 10 of the child protection law, 1975 PA 238, MCL 722.630. (h) "Nonparent adult" means a person who is 18 years of age or older and who, regardless of the person's domicile, meets all of the following criteria in relation to a child over whom the court takes jurisdiction under this chapter: (i) Has substantial and regular contact with the child. (ii) Has a close personal relationship with the child's parent or with a person responsible for the child's health or welfare. (iii) Is not the child's parent or a person otherwise related to the child by blood or affinity to the third degree. (i) "Permanent foster family agreement" means an agreement for a child 14 years old of age or older to remain with a particular foster family until the child is 18 years old of age under standards and requirements established by the department, which agreement is among all of the following: (i) The child. (ii) If the child is a temporary ward, the child's family. (iii) The foster family. (iv) The child placing agency responsible for the child's care in foster care. (j) "Relative" means an individual who is at least 18 years of age and is either of the following: (i) Related to the child within the fifth degree by blood, marriage, or adoption, including the spouse of an individual related to the child within the fifth degree, even after the marriage has ended by death or divorce, the parent who shares custody of a half-sibling, and the parent of a man whom the court has found probable cause to believe is the putative father if there is no man with legally established rights to the child. (ii) Not related to a child within the fifth degree by blood, marriage, or adoption but who has a strong positive emotional tie or role in the child's life or the child's parent's life if the child is an infant, as determined by the department or, if the child is an Indian child, as determined solely by the Indian child's tribe. As used in this section, "Indian child" and "Indian child's tribe" mean those terms as defined in section 3 of chapter XIIB. (k) "Sex offenders registration act" means the sex offenders registration act, 1994 PA 295, MCL 28.721 to 28.730. (l) "Sibling" means a child who is related through birth or adoption by at least 1 common parent. Sibling includes that term as defined by an American Indian or Alaskan native child's tribal code or custom. (2) If a juvenile is alleged to be within the provisions of section 2(b) of this chapter, the court may authorize a petition to be filed at the conclusion of the preliminary hearing or inquiry. The court may authorize the petition upon a showing of probable cause that 1 or more of the allegations in the petition are true and fall within the provisions of section 2(b) of this chapter. If a petition is before the court because the department is required to submit the petition under section 17 of the child protection law, 1975 PA 238, MCL 722.637, the court shall hold a hearing on the petition within 24 hours or on the next business day after the petition is submitted, at which hearing the court shall consider at least the matters governed by subsections (4) and (5). (3) Except as provided in subsections (5) and (6), if a petition under subsection (2) is authorized, the court may release the juvenile in the custody of either of the juvenile's parents or the juvenile's guardian or custodian under reasonable terms and conditions necessary for either the juvenile's physical health or mental well-being. (4) The court may order a parent, guardian, custodian, nonparent adult, or other person residing in a child's home to leave the home and, except as the court orders, not to subsequently return to the home if all of the following take place: (a) A petition alleging abuse of the child by the parent, guardian, custodian, nonparent adult, or other person is authorized under subsection (2). (b) The court after a hearing finds probable cause to believe the parent, guardian, custodian, nonparent adult, or other person committed the abuse. (c) The court finds on the record that the presence in the home of the person alleged to have committed the abuse presents a substantial risk of harm to the child's life, physical health, or mental well-being. (5) If a petition alleges abuse by a person described in subsection (4), regardless of whether the court orders the alleged abuser to leave the child's home under subsection (4), the court shall not leave the child in or return the child to the child's home or place the child with a person not licensed under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128, unless the court finds that the conditions of custody at the placement and with the individual with whom the child is placed are adequate to safeguard the child from the risk of harm to the child's life, physical health, or mental well-being. (6) If a court finds a parent is required by court order to register under the sex offenders registration act, the department may, but is not required to, make reasonable efforts to reunify the child with the parent. The court may order reasonable efforts to be made by the department. (7) In determining whether to enter an order under subsection (4), the court may consider whether the parent who is to remain in the juvenile's home is married to the person to be removed or has a legal right to retain possession of the home. (8) An order entered under subsection (4) may also contain 1 or more of the following terms or conditions: (a) The court may require the alleged abusive parent to pay appropriate support to maintain a suitable home environment for the juvenile during the duration of the order. (b) The court may order the alleged abusive person, according to terms the court may set, to surrender to a local law enforcement agency any firearms or other potentially dangerous weapons the alleged abusive person owns, possesses, or uses. (c) The court may include any reasonable term or condition necessary for the juvenile's physical or mental well-being or necessary to protect the juvenile. (9) The court may order placement of the child in foster care if the court finds all of the following conditions: (a) Custody of the child with the parent presents a substantial risk of harm to the child's life, physical health, or mental well-being. (b) No provision of service or other arrangement except removal of the child is reasonably available to adequately safeguard the child from risk as described in subdivision (a). (c) Continuing the child's residence in the home is contrary to the child's welfare. (d) Consistent with the circumstances, reasonable efforts were made to prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the child. (e) Conditions of child custody away from the parent are adequate to safeguard the child's health and welfare. (10) If the court orders placement of the juvenile outside the juvenile's home, the court shall inform the parties of the following: (a) That the agency has the responsibility to prepare an initial services plan within 30 days of the juvenile's placement. (b) The general elements of an initial services plan as required by the rules promulgated under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128. (c) That participation in the initial services plan is voluntary without a court order. (11) Before or within 7 days after a child is placed in a relative's home, the department shall perform a criminal record check and central registry clearance. If the child is placed in the home of a relative, the court shall order a home study to be performed and a copy of the home study to be submitted to the court not more than 30 days after the placement. (12) In determining placement of a juvenile pending trial, the court shall order the juvenile placed in the most family-like setting available consistent with the juvenile's needs. (13) If a juvenile is removed from the parent's custody at any time, the court shall permit the juvenile's parent to have regular and frequent parenting time with the juvenile. Parenting time between the juvenile and his or her the juvenile's parent must not be less than 1 time every 7 days unless the court determines either that exigent circumstances require less frequent parenting time or that parenting time, even if supervised, may be harmful to the juvenile's life, physical health, or mental well-being. If the court determines that parenting time, even if supervised, may be harmful to the juvenile's life, physical health, or mental well-being, the court may suspend parenting time until the risk of harm no longer exists. The court may order the juvenile to have a psychological evaluation or counseling, or both, to determine the appropriateness and the conditions of parenting time. (14) Reasonable efforts must be made to do the following: (a) Place siblings removed from their home in the same foster care, kinship guardianship, or adoptive placement, unless the supervising agency documents that a joint placement would be contrary to the safety or well-being of any of the siblings. (b) In the case of siblings removed from their home who are not jointly placed, provide for visitation, at least monthly, or other ongoing interaction between the siblings, unless the supervising agency documents that visitation, at least monthly, or other ongoing interaction would be contrary to the safety or well-being of any of the siblings. (15) If the supervising agency documents that visitation or other contact is contrary to the safety or well-being of any of the siblings and temporarily suspends visitation or contact, the supervising agency shall report its determination to the court for consideration at the next review hearing. (16) If the supervising agency temporarily suspends visitation or contact, the court shall review the decision and determine whether sibling visitation or contact will be beneficial to the siblings. If so, the court shall order sibling visitation or contact to the extent reasonable. (17) Upon the motion of any party, the court shall review custody and placement orders and initial services plans pending trial and may modify those orders and plans as the court considers under this section is in the juvenile's best interests. (18) The court shall include in an order placing a child in foster care an order directing the release of information concerning the child in accordance with this subsection. If a child is placed in foster care, within 10 days after receipt of a written request, the agency shall provide the person who is providing the foster care with copies of all initial, updated, and revised case service plans and court orders relating to the child and all of the child's medical, mental health, and education reports, including reports compiled before the child was placed with that person. (19) In an order placing a child in foster care, the court shall include both of the following: (a) An order that the child's parent, guardian, or custodian provide the supervising agency with the name and address of each of the child's medical providers. (b) An order that each of the child's medical providers release the child's medical records. The order may specify providers by profession or type of institution. (20) Nothing in this section is intended to supersede the placement preferences for an Indian child under chapter XIIB. (21) As used in this section, "abuse" means 1 or more of the following: (a) Harm or threatened harm by a person to a juvenile's health or welfare that occurs through nonaccidental physical or mental injury. (b) Engaging in sexual contact or sexual penetration as those terms are defined in section 520a of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.520a, with a juvenile. (c) Sexual exploitation of a juvenile, which includes, but is not limited to, allowing, permitting, or encouraging a juvenile to engage in prostitution a commercial sexual activity or allowing, permitting, encouraging, or engaging in photographing, filming, or depicting a juvenile engaged in a listed sexual act as that term is defined in section 145c of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.145c. (d) Maltreatment of a juvenile. Sec. 18k. (1) An individual shall provide samples for chemical testing for DNA identification profiling or a determination of the sample's genetic markers and shall provide samples for chemical testing for a determination of his or her the individual's secretor status if any of the following apply: (a) The individual is arrested for committing or attempting to commit an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult. (b) The individual is convicted of, or found responsible for, a felony or attempted felony, or any of the following misdemeanors, or local ordinances that are substantially corresponding to the following misdemeanors: (i) A violation of section 167(1)(c), (f), or (i) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.167, disorderly person by window peeping, engaging in indecent or obscene conduct in public, or loitering in a house, of ill fame or prostitution.vehicle, or other place in which commercial sexual activity is practiced, encouraged, or allowed. (ii) A violation of section 335a(1) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.335a, indecent exposure. (iii) A violation punishable under section 451(1) or (2) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.451, first and second prostitution commercial sexual activity violations. (2) Notwithstanding subsection (1), if at the time the individual is arrested for the offense the investigating law enforcement agency or the department of state police already has a sample from the individual that meets the requirements of the DNA identification profiling system act, 1990 PA 250, MCL 28.171 to 28.176, the individual is not required to provide another sample or pay the assessment required under subsection (4). (3) The samples required to be collected under this section shall must be collected by the investigating law enforcement agency and transmitted by the investigating law enforcement agency to the department of state police in the manner prescribed under the DNA identification profiling system act, 1990 PA 250, MCL 28.171 to 28.176, when a petition is filed or the court issues a summons. (4) The court shall order each individual found responsible for or convicted of 1 or more crimes listed in subsection (1) to pay an assessment of $60.00. The assessment required under this subsection is in addition to any fine, costs, or other assessments imposed by the court. (5) An assessment required under subsection (4) shall must be ordered upon the record, and shall must be listed separately in the adjudication order, judgment of sentence, or order of probation. (6) After reviewing a verified petition by an individual against whom an assessment is imposed under subsection (4), the court may suspend payment of all or part of the assessment if it determines the individual is unable to pay the assessment. (7) The court that imposes the assessment prescribed under subsection (4) may retain 10% of all assessments or portions of assessments collected for costs incurred under this section and shall transmit that money to its funding unit. On the last day of each month, the clerk of the court shall transmit the assessments or portions of assessments collected under this section as follows: (a) Twenty-five percent to the county sheriff or other investigating law enforcement agency that collected the DNA sample as designated by the court to defray the costs of collecting DNA samples. (b) Sixty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the justice system fund created in section 181 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.181. (8) The department of human services or a county juvenile agency, investigating law enforcement agency, prosecuting agency, or court that has in its possession a DNA identification profile obtained from a sample of an individual arrested for an offense described in subsection (1) shall forward the DNA identification profile to the department of state police when a petition is filed or the court issues a summons unless the department of state police already has a DNA identification profile of the individual. (9) As used in this section: (a) "DNA identification profile" and "DNA identification profiling" mean those terms as defined in section 2 of the DNA identification profiling system act, 1990 PA 250, MCL 28.172. (b) "Felony" means a violation of a penal law of this state for which the offender may be punished by imprisonment for more than 1 year or an offense expressly designated by law to be a felony. (c) "Investigating law enforcement agency" means the law enforcement agency responsible for the investigation of the offense for which the individual is arrested, convicted, or found responsible. Investigating law enforcement agency does not include a probation officer employed by the department of corrections. (d) "Sample" means a portion of an individual's blood, saliva, or tissue collected from the individual. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5016 (request no. H04060'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.